el: Τύπος λαβής slapstick: Λαβή με θηλιά/λουράκι; Χυτή πλαστική λαβή; Χωρίς λαβή (μόνο ράβδος); Λαβή τύπου πιστολιού; Λαβή με επένδυση καουτσούκ; Ξύλινη λαβή; Άλλο
es: Tipo de mango del slapstick: Mango con bucle/correa; Mango de plástico moldeado; Sin mango (solo palo); Mango con empuñadura de pistola; Mango con agarre de goma; Mango de madera; Otro
ja: スラップスティックハンドルタイプ: ループ/ストラップハンドル; 成形プラスチックハンドル; ハンドルなし (スティックのみ); ピストルグリップハンドル; ラバーグリップハンドル; 木製ハンドル; その他
fi: Slapstick-kahvan tyyppi: Lenkki-/hihnakahva; Valettu muovikahva; Ei kahvaa (vain keppi); Pistoolikahva; Kumipinnoitettu kahva; Puukahva; Muu
sl-SI: Vrsta ročaja biča: Ročaj z zanko/trakom; Uliti plastični ročaj; Brez ročaja (samo palica); Pištolski ročaj; Gumiran ročaj; Lesen ročaj; Drugo
bg-BG: Тип дръжка на slapstick: Дръжка с примка/каишка; Дръжка от формована пластмаса; Без дръжка (само пръчка); Дръжка тип пистолетен захват; Гумирана дръжка; Дървена дръжка; Друг
en: Slapstick handle type: Loop/strap handle; Molded plastic handle; No handle (stick-only); Pistol-grip handle; Rubberized grip handle; Wood handle; Other
th: หวดแฮนสลิงประเภท: ด้ามจับแบบห่วง/สายรัด; ด้ามจับพลาสติกหล่อขึ้นรูป; ไม่มีด้ามจับ (มีแต่ไม้); ด้ามจับทรงปืน; ด้ามจับหุ้มยาง; ด้ามจับไม้; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Tipo de pega do slapstick: Pega de alça/fita; Pega de plástico moldado; Sem pega (apenas pau); Pega tipo pistola; Pega de borracha; Pega de madeira; Outro
pt-BR: Slapstick tipo de cabo: Alça de laço/tira; Alça de plástico moldado; Sem alça (apenas bastão); Alça estilo pistola; Alça emborrachada; Alça de madeira; Outro
nl: Slapstick handgreeptype: Lus-/riemhandvat; Gegoten plastic handvat; Geen handvat (alleen stok); Pistoolgreep; Rubberen handvat; Houten handvat; Overig
ko: 슬랩스틱 핸들 유형: 루프/스트랩 핸들; 성형 플라스틱 핸들; 핸들 없음(스틱형); 피스톨 그립 핸들; 고무 그립 핸들; 목재 핸들; 기타
fr: Type de poignée de la claquette: Poignée avec boucle/sangle; Poignée en plastique moulé; Sans poignée (bâton uniquement); Poignée pistolet; Poignée avec grip en caoutchouc; Poignée en bois; Autre
zh-CN: 恶作剧道具把手类型: 环形/绑带把手; 模制塑料把手; 无把手（仅拍板）; 手枪式握把; 橡胶握把; 木质把手; 其他
nb: Slapstick-håndtakstype: Løkke-/stropphåndtak; Støpt plasthåndtak; Uten håndtak (kun pinne); Pistolgrep; Gummiert håndtak; Trehåndtak; Annet
ru: Тип ручки slapstick: Ручка-петля/ремешок; Литая пластиковая ручка; Без ручки (только палочки); Пистолетная рукоятка; Прорезиненная ручка; Деревянная ручка; Другое
it: Tipo di impugnatura slapstick: Manico con passante/cinturino; Manico in plastica sagomata; Nessun manico (solo bastone); Manico a pistola; Manico con impugnatura gommata; Manico in legno; Altro
zh-TW: 拍板把手類型: 環圈/束帶握把; 模製塑膠握把; 無握把 (僅板身); 手槍式握把; 橡膠握把; 木質握把; 其他
pl: Typ uchwytu bata: Uchwyt pętlowy/paskowy; Uchwyt z formowanego plastiku; Brak uchwytu (tylko kij); Uchwyt pistoletowy; Gumowany uchwyt; Uchwyt drewniany; Inne
da: Håndtagstype for slapstick: Løkke-/strophåndtag; Støbt plastikhåndtag; Intet håndtag (kun pind); Pistolgreb; Gummibelagt håndtag; Træhåndtag; Andet
tr: Slapstick sap tipi: İlmekli/kayışlı sap; Kalıplı plastik sap; Sapsız (sadece çubuk); Tabanca kabzalı sap; Kauçuk kavramalı sap; Ahşap sap; Diğer
hu: Ostor markolattípusa: Hurok-/pántfogantyú; Fröccsöntött műanyag fogantyú; Fogantyú nélkül (csak ütő); Pisztolymarkolatú fogantyú; Gumírozott fogantyú; Fa fogantyú; Egyéb
vi: Kiểu tay cầm hài hước: Tay cầm dạng vòng/dây đeo; Tay cầm nhựa đúc; Không có tay cầm (chỉ có gậy); Tay cầm báng súng; Tay cầm bọc cao su; Tay cầm bằng gỗ; Khác
lt-LT: Slapstick rankenos tipas: Kilpos / dirželio formos rankena; Formuoto plastiko rankena; Be rankenos (tik lazdelė); Pistoleto tipo rankena; Gumuota rankena; Medinė rankena; Kita
de: Griffart des Slapsticks: Schlaufen-/Riemengriff; Geformter Kunststoffgriff; Kein Griff (nur Stab); Pistolengriff; Gummierter Griff; Holzgriff; Andere
cs: Typ rukojeti slapstick: Rukojeť s poutkem/popruhem; Rukojeť z tvarovaného plastu; Bez rukojeti (pouze bič); Pistolová rukojeť; Pogumovaná rukojeť; Dřevěná rukojeť; Jiný
ro-RO: Tip de mâner pentru slapstick: Mâner tip buclă/curea; Mâner din plastic turnat; Fără mâner (doar băț); Mâner tip pistol; Mâner cauciucat; Mâner din lemn; Altul
sk-SK: Typ rukoväte slapstick: Slučková/remienková rukoväť; Tvarovaná plastová rukoväť; Bez rukoväti (len palica); Rukoväť v tvare pištole; Pogumovaná rukoväť; Drevená rukoväť; Iné
sv: Slapstick-handtagstyp: Ögla/remhandtag; Formgjutet plasthandtag; Inget handtag (endast käpp); Pistolgreppshandtag; Gummerat grepphandtag; Trähandtag; Övrigt
hr-HR: Slapstick korisničko ime tipa: Ručka s petljom / remenom; Ručka od lijevane plastike; Bez ručke (samo štap); Ručka s pištoljskim hvatom; Gumirana ručka; Drvena ručka; Ostalo